Hawaii statutes.
§130-3 Emergency seat of county government.
Whenever, due to an emergency resulting from the effects of enemy attack, or
the anticipated effects of a threatened enemy attack, it becomes imprudent,
inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of county government at the
regular or usual place or places thereof, the governing body of each county may
meet at any place within or without the territorial limits of the county on the
call of the presiding officer or any two members of the governing body, and
shall proceed to establish and designate by ordinance, resolution, or other
manner, alternate or substitute sites or places as the emergency temporary
location, or locations, of government where all, or any part, of the public
business may be transacted and conducted during the emergency situation. The
sites or places may be within or without the territorial limits of the county
and may be within or without the State. [L 1959, c 16, §3; Supp, §359A-3; HRS
§130-3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next